Hawaii statutes.
[§196D-8] Information services. The
department shall:

(1) Operate a permit information and coordination
center during normal working hours, which will provide guidance to potential
applicants for the project with regard to the permits and procedures that may
apply to the project; and

(2) Maintain and update a repository of the laws,
rules, procedures, permit requirements, and criteria of agencies whose
permitting functions are not transferred by section 196D-10 to the department
for the purposes of the project and which have control or regulatory power over
any aspect of the project and of federal agencies having jurisdiction over any
aspect of the project. [L 1988, c 301, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next